Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-511
Obligations; payment; method; requirements.

At the first meeting of the city council of a city of the metropolitan class in each month, the city council shall provide, by ordinance, for the payment of all indebtedness of the city incurred during the preceding month, or at any time prior to such preceding month, except those liabilities for wages of laborers and allowed claims for overtime, the payment of which may be provided for weekly but in the same manner as provided for in sections 14-101 to 14-2004. Money of the city shall not be expended except as specified by law. The ordinance providing for the payment of money shall be duly passed by a majority vote of the entire city council, and the ayes and nays on such ordinance recorded in the proceedings of the city council.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 10, p. 473;

C.S.1922, § 3634;

C.S.1929, § 14-511;

R.S.1943, § 14-511;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 162.
July 21, 2022